Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-311.07
Hazing; consent not a defense.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, consent shall not be a defense to a prosecution pursuant to section 28-311.06.

Laws 1994, LB 1129, § 3.